test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_kaarbis_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - käärbis: # MLO, ok 
    käärbis+N+Sg+Nom:  käärbis
    käärbis+N+Sg+Gen:  kárbá
    käärbis+N+Sg+Acc:  kárbá
    käärbis+N+Sg+Ill:  kárbás
    käärbis+N+Sg+Loc:  kárbást
    käärbis+N+Sg+Com:  kárbáin
    käärbis+N+Sg+Abe:  kárbáttáá # obs: páˊlgáttáá
    käärbis+N+Ess:  käˊrbisin
    käärbis+N+Par:  käˊrbisid
    käärbis+N+Pl+Nom:  kárbáh
    käärbis+N+Pl+Gen:  kárbái
    käärbis+N+Pl+Acc:  kárbáid
    käärbis+N+Pl+Ill:  kárbáid
    käärbis+N+Pl+Loc:  kárbáin
    käärbis+N+Pl+Com:  kárbáiguin
    käärbis+N+Pl+Abe:  kárbáittáá

  Noun - riegis: # MLO, ok 
    riegis+N+Sg+Nom:  riegis
    riegis+N+Sg+Gen:  riägˊgá
    riegis+N+Sg+Acc:  riägˊgá
    riegis+N+Sg+Ill:  riägˊgás
    riegis+N+Sg+Loc:  riägˊgást
    riegis+N+Sg+Com:  riägˊgáin
    riegis+N+Sg+Abe:  riäˊgáttáá
    riegis+N+Ess:  rieˊgisin
    riegis+N+Par:  rieˊgisid
    riegis+N+Pl+Nom:  riägˊgáh
    riegis+N+Pl+Gen:  riägˊgái
    riegis+N+Pl+Acc:  riägˊgáid
    riegis+N+Pl+Ill:  riägˊgáid
    riegis+N+Pl+Loc:  riägˊgáin
    riegis+N+Pl+Com:  riägˊgáiguin
    riegis+N+Pl+Abe:  riägˊgáittáá

  Noun - lääbis: # MLO, ok 
    lääbis+N+Sg+Nom:  lääbis
    lääbis+N+Sg+Gen:  lábbá
    lääbis+N+Sg+Acc:  lábbá
    lääbis+N+Sg+Ill:  lábbás
    lääbis+N+Sg+Loc:  lábbást
    lääbis+N+Sg+Com:  lábbáin
    lääbis+N+Sg+Abe:  lábáttáá # obs: páˊlgáttáá
    lääbis+N+Ess:  läˊbisin
    lääbis+N+Par:  läˊbisid
    lääbis+N+Pl+Nom:  lábbáh
    lääbis+N+Pl+Gen:  lábbái
    lääbis+N+Pl+Acc:  lábbáid
    lääbis+N+Pl+Ill:  lábbáid
    lääbis+N+Pl+Loc:  lábbáin
    lääbis+N+Pl+Com:  lábbáiguin
    lääbis+N+Pl+Abe:  lábbáittáá

  Noun - päälgis: # MLO, ok
    päälgis+N+Sg+Nom:  päälgis
    päälgis+N+Sg+Gen:  pálgá
    päälgis+N+Sg+Acc:  pálgá
    päälgis+N+Sg+Ill:  pálgás
    päälgis+N+Sg+Loc:  pálgást
    päälgis+N+Sg+Com:  pálgáin
    päälgis+N+Sg+Abe:  páˊlgáttáá
    päälgis+N+Ess:  päˊlgisin
    päälgis+N+Par:  päˊlgisid
    päälgis+N+Pl+Nom:  pálgáh
    päälgis+N+Pl+Gen:  pálgái
    päälgis+N+Pl+Acc:  pálgáid
    päälgis+N+Pl+Ill:  pálgáid
    päälgis+N+Pl+Loc:  pálgáin
    päälgis+N+Pl+Com:  pálgáiguin
    päälgis+N+Pl+Abe:  pálgáittáá

  Noun - čyegis: # MLO, ok 
    čyegis+N+Sg+Nom:  čyegis
    čyegis+N+Sg+Gen:  čuágˊgá
    čyegis+N+Sg+Acc:  čuágˊgá
    čyegis+N+Sg+Ill:  čuágˊgás
    čyegis+N+Sg+Loc:  čuágˊgást
    čyegis+N+Sg+Com:  čuágˊgáin
    čyegis+N+Sg+Abe:  čuáˊgáttáá
    čyegis+N+Ess:  čyeˊgisin
    čyegis+N+Par:  čyeˊgisid
    čyegis+N+Pl+Nom:  čuágˊgáh
    čyegis+N+Pl+Gen:  čuágˊgái
    čyegis+N+Pl+Acc:  čuágˊgáid
    čyegis+N+Pl+Ill:  čuágˊgáid
    čyegis+N+Pl+Loc:  čuágˊgáin
    čyegis+N+Pl+Com:  čuágˊgáiguin
    čyegis+N+Pl+Abe:  čuágˊgáittáá
    
